Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.700

Planning agency—Time limit for report.

Failure of the planning agency to report on the matters referred to in RCW 36.70.690 within forty days after the reference, or such longer period as may be designated by the board, department or official making the reference, shall be deemed to be approval of such matter.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.700. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 70.]